Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB823.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1517(a.1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1517. Fire and Emergency Evacuation Drills.--* * *(a.1) Within ninety (90) days of the commencement of the school year after the effective date of this subsection and within ninety (90) days of the commencement of each school year thereafter, each school entity shall conduct one school security drill per school year in each school building in place of a fire drill required under subsection (a). After ninety (90) days from 123456789101112131415161718 the commencement of each school year, each school entity may conduct two school security drills per school year in each school building in place of two fire drills required under subsection (a). All of the following shall apply:(1) The school security drill shall be conducted while the school entity is in session and students are present under policies adopted by the chief school administrator.(2) The chief school administrator or a designee shall oversee the instruction and training of students and school employees in the procedures to be used in the school security drill.(3) The chief school administrator shall notify and request assistance from the local law enforcement agency and emergency management agency before conducting the school security drill.(4) The chief school administrator shall provide notice of the school security drill and debrief period required under paragraph (8) at least seven (7) days in advance to parents and legal guardians of the students attending the school building for which the school security drill is scheduled.(5) A school security drill shall be age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate and include trauma-informed approaches to address the concerns and well-being of students and school personnel.(6) The content of a school security drill shall include and involve school personnel, including school-based mental health professionals or a designee selected by the chief school administrator.(7) A school security drill shall not include any props, actors, simulations or other tactics intended to mimic an incident of violence or other emergency, including:20250HB0823PN0850 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Authentic or simulated weapons.(ii) Gunfire.(iii) Simulated fatalities, wounds or injuries.(iv) Simulated blood.(v) An individual posing as an active shooter or a victim of an active shooter.(8) Immediately following a school security drill, each school entity shall implement a reasonable amount of time for teachers to debrief with their students. During the debrief period, students shall be allowed to access any mental health services available on campus.(9) A school security drill shall be accompanied by an announcement prior to commencement that uses concise and age-appropriate language and, at a minimum, informs students that there is no immediate danger to life and safety.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0823PN0850 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617